dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
# English Hunspell affix file
# Licensed under the GNU Lesser General Public License,
# version 3 or any later version
#
# Spelling and usage verified against:
#   1) Oxford Dictionaries
#   2) Collins Dictionary
#   3) Cambridge Dictionary
#   4) Merriam-Webster Dictionary
#   5) Wiktionary (used with caution)
#   6) Wikipedia (used with caution)
#   7) Printed dictionaries and other reference works
#
#
# Key challenges in dictionary development:
#   1) Proper names and place names
#   2) Possessive forms
#   3) Plural forms
#   4) Derived and inflected forms
#   5) Hyphenated compounds
#   6) Regional spelling and vocabulary differences
#
#
# Principal historical contributors:
# Kevin Atkinson, David Bartlett, Andrew Brown, Dwayne Bailey,
# and Marco A.G.Pinto
#
# See README_en_GB_ZA_US_CA_AU.txt for further information.
#
#
# Dictionary Information:
#        English variant: OED (Oxford English Dictionary)
#                Version: 4.0.9, 2026-09-01
#               Encoding: UTF-8-BOM Unix (LF)
#   -ise/-ize/Both/Mixed: -ize
#               Comments: The U.S., Canadian, and Australian dictionaries MAY differ slightly in coverage for some region-specific terms.
#    Variants maintained: British, OED (Oxford English Dictionary), South African, American (alt), Canadian (alt), Australian (alt)
#
#
#        Maintainer: Marco A.G.Pinto
#   Project website: https://proofingtoolgui.org
# GitHub repository: https://github.com/marcoagpinto/aoo-mozilla-en-dict
#  Personal article: https://marcoagpinto.com
#            E-mail: marcoagpinto@sapo.pt
#
#
# Flags description:
# A # re- prefix: to do again
# a # mis- prefix
# I # in- im- il- ir- prefixes for negation
# c # over- prefix: extends
# U # un- prefix: reverse the action
# C # de- prefix: reverse
# E # dis- prefix for negation
# F # con- prefix
# K # pre- prefix
# e # out- prefix
# f # under- prefix
# ^ # non- prefix
# 4 # trans- prefix
# V # -ive endings for verbs
# v # -ively endings for verbs
# N # -ion and -ion's ends for stem verb creating uncountable action noun
# n # -ion, -ions and -ion's ends for stem verb creating action noun
# X # -ions ends for stem verb creating action noun plural
# x # -ional, -ionally ends for stem verb
# H # adds both -th and -fold suffixes
# Y # -ly adverb endings (for adjectives)
# G # -ing endings for verbs where the stress falls on the last syllable
# J # plural noun form of -ings verbs
# k # -ingly endings
# D # regular verb past tenses and past participle with -ed
# d # regular verb past tenses and past participle with -ed
# d # regular adverbial -ing endings.
# | # for U.S. verbs ending with one L, R, P or E, for -ing -ed
# ; # for U.S. verbs ending with one L, R, P or E, for -ing's -ings
# h # -edly to form adverb from thing
# T # adjectival comparatives: big bigger biggest
# R # -er, -ers, -er's ending for verbs creating thing or person who does
# r # -er, -ers, -er's ending for verbs creating thing or person who does
# S # noun plurals and verb conjugation (I you he we you they)
# é # -es, -ves, noun irregular plurals
# m # -man, -men, -man's, -men's suffixes
# 5 # -woman, -women, -woman's, -women's, suffixes
# 6 # -ful suffix
# j # -fully suffix
# p # -less suffix
# Q # -ise, -ises, -ised, -ising
# 8 # -ize, -izes, -ized, -izing
# q # -isation, -isations and -isation's, suffixes for nouns
# - # -ization, -izations and -ization's, suffixes for nouns
# s # -iser, -isers, -iser's, suffixes for nouns
# 9 # -izer, -izers, -izer's, suffixes for nouns
# t # -isable, -isability, suffixes for nouns
# + # -izable, -izability, suffixes for nouns
# M # possessive form
# B # -able, -ability forms for words
# 7 # -able, -ability forms for words where stem emphasis is NOT on last syllable
# g # -ability form for words where stem emphasis is NOT on last syllable
# l # -ably endings
# b # -ible endings
# L # -ment, -ments, -ment's suffixes
# Z # -y, diminutive and adjectival form
# P # -ness, -nesses, -ness's suffixes for adjectives
# 2 # -iness, -inesses, -iness's, diminutive and adjectival comparison form
# u # -iveness endings for verbs
# i # -edness,-ednesses,-edness's suffixes
# = # -lessness, -lessnesses, -lessness's suffixes
# z # -ily, adverbial ending for nouns where the adjective form adds y
# y # -ry, adjectival and noun forms
# O # -al, noun from verb
# W # -ic, adjectival ending
# o # -ally, adverb form from verb
# w # -ical, adjectival ending
# 1 # -ically, adverbial form ending
# 3 # -ist, -ists, -ist's suffixes
# í # -ist, -ists, -ist's suffixes American (single-L words)
# ~ # -ish, adjectival ending
# á # -like, adjectival ending


SET UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8

TRY esiaénrtolcdugmfphbyvkw-'.zqjxSNRTLCGDMFPHBEAUYOIVKWóöâôZQJXÅçèîêàïüäñ

ICONV 6
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl

# MAXNGRAMSUGS: 5 = cleaner, more Word-like, less noise; 7 = balanced compromise.
MAXNGRAMSUGS 7

NOSUGGEST !

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND _
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE #*0{
COMPOUNDRULE #*@}

WORDCHARS 0123456789’'

REP 38
REP ce se
REP ce ts
REP ch k
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP dg j
REP eg e.g.
REP eness ity
REP f gh
REP f ph
REP f ugh
REP ff ugh
REP gh f
REP ght t
REP ie i.e.
REP ie y
REP j dg
REP k ch
REP l ll
REP leness ility
REP ll l
REP ness ity
REP ness ivity
REP og ogue
REP ok OK
REP ph f
REP se ce
REP si ci
REP t ght
REP ter tor
REP teh the
REP tor ter
REP ts ce
REP ua ue
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP w ugh
REP y ie

PFX A Y 2
PFX A 0 re [^e] 
PFX A 0 re- e 
PFX a Y 1
PFX a 0 mis . 
PFX I Y 4
PFX I 0 il l 
PFX I 0 im [bmp] 
PFX I 0 in [^blmpr] 
PFX I 0 ir r 
PFX c Y 1
PFX c 0 over . 
PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un . 
PFX C Y 2
PFX C 0 de [^e] 
PFX C 0 de- e 
PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 dis . 
PFX F Y 5
PFX F 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX F 0 col l
PFX F 0 com [bmp]
PFX F 0 con [^abehilmopru]. 
PFX F 0 cor r
PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 pre . 
PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 out . 
PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0 under [^r] 
PFX f 0 under- r 
PFX ^ Y 1
PFX ^ 0 non- . 
PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 trans . 

SFX V Y 15
SFX V 0 ative [^abdeilosty] 
SFX V 0 ative [^aeiou]l 
SFX V e ative [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX V ke cative ke 
SFX V y icative y 
SFX V 0 ive [st] 
SFX V e ive [st]e 
SFX V 0 lative [aeiou]l 
SFX V b ptive b 
SFX V be ptive be 
SFX V e ptive me 
SFX V d sive d 
SFX V de sive de 
SFX V 0 tive [aio] 
SFX V e tive ce 
SFX v Y 15
SFX v 0 atively [^abdeilosty] 
SFX v 0 atively [^aeiou]l 
SFX v e atively [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX v ke catively ke 
SFX v y icatively y 
SFX v 0 ively [st] 
SFX v e ively [st]e 
SFX v 0 latively [aeiou]l 
SFX v b ptively b 
SFX v be ptively be 
SFX v e ptively me 
SFX v d sively d 
SFX v de sively de 
SFX v 0 tively [aio] 
SFX v e tively ce 
SFX u Y 15
SFX u 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty] 
SFX u 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l 
SFX u e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX u ke cativeness ke 
SFX u y icativeness y 
SFX u 0 iveness [st] 
SFX u e iveness [st]e 
SFX u 0 lativeness [aeiou]l 
SFX u b ptiveness b 
SFX u be ptiveness be 
SFX u e ptiveness me 
SFX u d siveness d 
SFX u de siveness de 
SFX u 0 tiveness [aio] 
SFX u e tiveness ce 
