dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
ace/rVunMSvDG
acrolect/SO^
action/IMS4A
actor/S4MA
adjust/RLDlGS7V
admit/SANDGX
adsorb/XvDVGS
advisable/I
agreeable/PE
agro-industry/SO^
allocate/CDnAGSK
allocator/KSC
allude/vDGVuXSN
alternate/MVvuSDGYn
analysed/aU
andropause/O^
aneurysm/OSM^
appetizing/UY
applies/Aa
appointed/EA
apprehends/a
approval/MES
arboriculture/O3^
arranged/EKA
articulable/I
articulate/nPSGyYDV
assault/GSVuMvDR
assemble/SGREDY
assembling/A
assert/xvuRSDVG
assigning/K
at/F
attrition/SMO^
authenticated/U
authorize/KA
axoneme/SO^
balances/cAe
behave/SaGDR
belief/SME
bids/fcAe
bit/CS
bound/ADSG
bridgeable/U
burdens/cU
calculates/Aa
calls/aA
cap/SADG
capable/IP
carriage/aSMf
casts/aAe
catenate/Fn
cay/SCM
cede/FKAGDS
charitable/UY
chief/SMa
chlamydia/OS^
cite/nAGDS
ck/C
closer/ESM
co-opt/NVSGD
coat/cMSf
coded/K4
coder/4SCM
cognition/AMKS
collect/bSivDV7hGM
colonize/AGCDSn
comes/ce
commendation/AM
commode/ESI
communicate/BDxSVvGnNu
communicates/a
compressibility/MI
compromising/UY
concept/xSVoM
conception/KSMa
conclude/RGDSvVu
conduct/aDGMS
conductance/4
confident/cY
configurable/K
confirm/nAGSD
conjunctiva/MSO^
conserve/VnvuM
considerateness/I
construction/CMAS
contaminate/VGDnS
content/LEDhGMS
contribute/DvGVy
convene/GADS
conventionality/MUS
corporeal/IY
correct/V7GuDSPvxTY
corrupt/VPTbvSDGYr
countenance/SDEG
courteousness/SE
crease/GISCD
create/uGnSDVv
creation/MASa
cuboid/SO^
curd/GvuMVSD
currently/AF
cursive/EY
d's/A
decisive/PIY
defeated/UY
defect/GuSDMVv
defend/VuvD
define/KSDAG
deflect/GSVD
demonstrate/uGnVSDv
deride/vkVuD
destruct/MbvVuGDS
determinacy/I
determination/IMK
develop/cdAS
developer/SAM
development/fMS
diction/KSM
did/AecU
direction/IMaS
discoid/O^
discriminating/IY
disjunct/SVv
disperse/LVubvDhRGS
dissipate/nVRDShiG
doctoral/K
domination/KM
done/fUeAcF
drawn/ceAI
dressed/cAU
dresses/AUc
duct/CDISGF
ectoderm/O^
educated/cfU
effect/DuGvVSM
effuse/DvuVSGr
emanate/DnVGS
embody/AEGDS
epicycloid/MOS^
equally/UF
equipped/UA
equity/MSI
erythema/O^
estimate/cGfASND
evade/SvRDVGu
evoke/VGuvSnD
exciting/Uc
exclude/RvVuGSDb
exhaust/rbkSVvDhuGM
explode/SDRGuVv
express/rSvbuDGYVM
expressibly/I
extinct/V
face/CGKDASe
favour/ERSMDG
fed/Ufc
fer/KLFC
figuration/MK4F
figure/EG4KSFD
file/CaSAGD
filer/CSM
fills/Ac
filopodia/O^
finite/CPYI
fits/Aae
flight's/cK
folds/AU
foliate/CGSnD
formation/OMFIC4S^
former/SC4FAI
forms/AKC4
fortune/SaM
freezes/AU
frequency/MSI
fusing/CA
fusion/IM4F
genially/F
go/fGe
goes/ef
government/aM
grew/cAe
grown/ceIA
growth/eSAIMcf
hale/SIDG
hallucinate/nyVGDS
hap/aS
harmful/PU
harmony/ESM
hear/GAaSc
heated/cKUA
herpetofauna/O^
ho's/F
houses/eA
humidification/CM
hydrogenating/C
identified/Ua
illustrate/nGDvSV
imaginably/U
imitate/DVGvunS
imperator/O^
include/SGXNvVDu
incorporated/EU
indulgence/cMS
infiltrate/V
innovate/VnGuDSyv
insurance/FMSA
integrate/EADSGN
intended/U
intension/Oo^
intercalate/DGVSn
interpreter/aMS
interrogate/SGyvDVn
interview's/K
join/FRSDG
jointing/E
junction/FSMIE
laid/Aacf
lax/vuTYSPV
laying/ca
leash/GSUD
legate/CDASnG
lie/FGcSf
limiter/CMS
lined/fUAe
lining/feA
literate/4NS
living/eA
logic/IMSY
lord/DcSMGf
lubricate/DSGnV
magnify/CSGRDn
make/GASU
mantle/ESDG
maturity/KMI
meditate/VSGDvun
mesoderm/OW^
migrate/INS4DnG
mingle/FGDS
missions/4
mob/CSDG
motes/C
mutable/FI4
mutator/FS
mute/Fn4NDSG
neg/unvV
nominate/CGASnD
notion/CS
nourished/fU
numbering/e
numeracy/SI
nymph/SMO^
obey/ESDGr
object/DSGvuVMp
obsess/xVSuDGv
occupy/ADSKnG
oceanic/4
operator/FMS
own/GESD
paid/KfUcA
parapodia/O^
pass/bklvXNVuS7M
passion/FM
paying/Kfc
payment/fMSc
penetrate/vnBSDVkuG
perfectness/SI
performed/Uf
pinning/fS
placement/eMS
placing/aA
plaint/uSvMV
plant/BIGSDA4
play/eGADESacf
player/SEM
plies/FAI
polarize/CnSGD
ported/A4EFCI
porting/FE4
posed/4AI
posing/AI4
posit/vuSVd
position's/EI4FCK
positions/4I
possession/MKEA
posted/AFI
poster/ISM
powered/cf
prepare/rVviGnyh
prevent/lu7vVr
processed/UA
produce/cDSGAn
production/Kf
prospect/GMvVuSDp
provoke/VuSRGknvD
pubescent/K
publican/ASM
purest/I
puts/e
quests/FI
quieting/E
rail/CDSGJ
ranked/Ue
reachable/U
reaction/cMS
reads/aA
refract/DyvGVS
reliability/UM
reporting/af
response/bvVSuM
restore/gRnVv
restrict/SDvhuVG7
reversibility/I
rigger/eSM
run/eGScA
safe/YU
sanguineous/F
satisfaction/SEM
sciences/FK
select/KSGCDA
sent/FEKUA
sequent/F
server/CKSM
set/eMS
sets/AI
sexed/fc
shape/ADaSG
shoot/fGSc
side/ISAKef
signed/fU
silviculture/3O^
solvable/IU
spend/eScaG
spent/Ufcea
spire/IDFSA
state/aSALGfIcD
station/eMS
stock/GcDAS
strainer/AMS
substitute/SMVBvDG
successfully/U
suggest/RGuVvSDb
supply/ASDGc
suspend/SNDRXGvV
take/RfGSJ
tend/FRKSIGD
tended/EU
tension/KMS
tester/FSCM
tibia/MSO^
times/ca
tire/cAGDS
tolerance/ISM
took/afcA
tour/CSGMFD
tract/E7ASF
trial/KaA
upon/F
usable/UA
user/aM
validation/IMA
valuation/f
values/fc
vented/KI
verses/4I
vote/CDGeS
went/f
wits/e
work/ADeScG
wrap/cU
written/fUcaA
